dictsource/cy_rules
// translation rules for Welsh language
// This file is UTF-8 encoded

.group a
     _)  a (_      A:
         a         A:
         a (C      a
         a (CC     a
         aa        A:

         a (b      A:
         a (d      A:
         a (g      A:
         a (ch     A:
         a (th     A:
         a (ff     A:
         a (s      A:
         a (f      A:
         a (dd     A:

         ae        AY
         ai        aI
         au        aY
      @) au (_     a
         aw (+     aU

.group b
     _)  b (_      bi:
         b         b

.group c
     _)  c (_      Ek
     _)  ch (_     Ex
         c         k
         ch        x
     e)  ch        C
     i)  ch        C
     u)  ch        C

.group d
     _)  d (_      di:
     _)  dd (_     ED
         d         d
         dd        D

.group e
     _)  e (_      e:
         e         e:
         e (C      E
         e (CC     E
         ee        e:
         e (b      e:
         e (d      e:
         e (g      e:
         e (ch     e:
         e (th     e:
         e (ff     e:
         e (s      e:
         e (f      e:
         e (dd     e:

         ei        @I
         ey        @I
         eu        @Y
         ew (+     eU
         e (wA     E

.group f
     _)  f (_      Ev
     _)  ff (_     Ef
         f         v
         ff        f

.group g
     _)  g (_      Eg
         g         g
         gwl       gw@-l
         gwn       gw@-n

.group h
     _)  h (_      hA:
         h         h

.group i
     _)  i (_      i:
         i         i:
         i (C      I
         i (CC     I
         ii        i:
         i (b      i:
         i (d      i:
         i (g      i:
         i (ch     i:
         i (th     i:
         i (ff     i:
         i (s      i:
         i (f      i:
         i (dd     i:
         i (l      i:
         i (n      i:
         i (r      i:

         i (A      j
         iw (+     Iu

.group j
     _)  j (_      dZV
         j         dZ

.group k
     _)  k (_      kV
         k         k

.group l
     _)  l (_      El
     _)  ll (_     EL
         l         l
         ll        L

.group m
     _)  m (_      Em
         m         m

.group n
     _)  n (_      En
     _)  ng (_     EN
         n         n
         ng        N

.group o
     _)  o (_      o:
         o         o:
         o (C      O
         o (CC     O
         oo        o:

         o (b      o:
         o (d      o:
         o (g      o:
         o (ch     o:
         o (th     o:
         o (ff     o:
         o (s      o:
         o (f      o:
         o (dd     o:

         oe        OY
         oi        OI
         ou        OY

.group p
     _)  p (_      pi:
     _)  ph (_     fi:
         p         p
         ph        f

.group q
     _)  q (_      kwA:
         q         k
         qu        kw

.group r
     _)  r (_      Er
     _)  rh (_     hro:
         r         r
         rh        hr

.group s
     _)  s (_      Es
         s         s
         si (A     S

.group t
     _)  t (_      ti:
     _)  th (_     ET
         t         t
         th        T

.group u
     _)  u (_      ,Ib'EdOl  // ???
         u         y:
         u (C      Y
         u (CC     Y
         uu        y:

         u (b      y:
         u (g      y:
         u (d      y:
         u (ch     y:
         u (th     y:
         u (ff     y:
         u (s      y:
         u (f      y:
         u (dd     y:
         u (ll     y:
         u (l      y:
         u (n      y:
         u (r      y:

         uw (+     Yu

.group v
     _)  v (_      vi:
         v         v

.group w
     _)  w (_      u:
     g)  w         w
         w         u:
     &)  w (K+     U
         w (C      U
         w (CC     U
         ww        u:

         w (b      u:
         w (d      u:
         w (g      u:
         w (ch     u:
         w (th     u:
         w (ff     u:
         w (s      u:
         w (f      u:
         w (dd     u:

         w (A      w
         wy        uY

.group x
     _)  x (_      Eks
         x         ks

.group y
     _)  y (_      V
         y (@+     V
         y         y:
         y (C      Y
         y (CC     Y

         y (d      y:
         y (s      y:
         y (th     y:
         y (ch     y:
         y (g      y:
         y (dd     y:

     _)  y (w      j
         yw (+     Yu
     _)  yn (_     @n
     _)  yn (_n    @

.group z
     _)  z (_      zu:
         z         z

.group
         â         A:
         ê         e:
         î         i:
         ô         o:
         û         y:
         ŵ         u:
         ŷ         y:

         à         a
         è         E
         ì         I
         ò         O
         ù         Y
         ẁ         U
         ỳ         Y

         ï         i:

         'ch (_S3  x
         'n (_S2   n
         'r (_S2   r

.group 9
         0         n'Ul      // just a guess
         1         'Yn
         2         d'aY
         3         tr'i:
         4         p'Edwar
         5         p'Ymp
         6         xvEC
         7         s'aIT
         8         wYT
         9         naU
